Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5628.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-18 of the General Laws entitled "Accident and Sickness Insurance
Policies" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-18-57.1. Single site parity.
(a) Subject to the provisions of the appropriate federal law, any health insurance contract,
plan, or policy delivered or issued for delivery or renewed in this state, shall provide equal
reimbursement to independent healthcare facilities as that of hospital affiliated facilities where
identical healthcare services are provided.
(b) The health insurance commissioner shall promulgate any rules and regulations as the
commissioner deems necessary for the efficient administration and enforcement of this section.
SECTION 2. Chapter 27-19 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Hospital Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-19-48.1. Single site parity.
(a) Subject to the provisions of the appropriate federal law, any health insurance contract,
plan, or policy delivered or issued for delivery or renewed in this state, shall provide equal
reimbursement to independent healthcare facilities as that of hospital affiliated facilities where
identical healthcare services are provided.
(b) The health insurance commissioner shall promulgate any rules and regulations as the
commissioner deems necessary for the efficient administration and enforcement of this section.
SECTION 3. Chapter 27-20 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Medical Service

Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-20-43.1. Single site parity.
(a) Subject to the provisions of the appropriate federal law, any health insurance contract,
plan, or policy delivered or issued for delivery or renewed in this state, shall provide equal
reimbursement to independent healthcare facilities as that of hospital affiliated facilities where
identical healthcare services are provided.
(b) The health insurance commissioner shall promulgate any rules and regulations as the
commissioner deems necessary for the efficient administration and enforcement of this section.
SECTION 4. Chapter 27-41 of the General Laws entitled "Health Maintenance
Organizations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-41-59.1. Single site parity.
(a) Subject to the provisions of the appropriate federal law, any health insurance contract,
plan, or policy delivered or issued for delivery or renewed in this state, shall provide equal
reimbursement to independent healthcare facilities as that of hospital affiliated facilities where
identical healthcare services are provided.
(b) The health insurance commissioner shall promulgate any rules and regulations as the
commissioner deems necessary for the efficient administration and enforcement of this section.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC001456
========
LC001456 - Page 2 of 3